Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.531

Effect of dissociation as general partner.

(1) Upon a person's dissociation as a general partner:

(a) The person's right to participate as a general partner in the management and conduct of the partnership's activities terminates;

(b) The person's duty of loyalty as a general partner under RCW 25.10.441(2)(c) terminates;

(c) The person's duty of loyalty as a general partner under RCW 25.10.441(2) (a) and (b) and duty of care under RCW 25.10.441(3) continue only with regard to matters arising and events occurring before the person's dissociation as a general partner;

(d) The person may sign and deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation pertaining to the person and, at the request of the limited partnership, shall sign an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership that states that the person has dissociated; and

(e) Subject to RCW 25.10.561 and article 11 of this chapter, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person's capacity as a general partner is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

(2) A person's dissociation as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners that the person incurred while a general partner.

[ 2009 c 188 s 605.]